Hawaii statutes.
§37-52.3 Criteria for the establishment and
continuance of special funds. Special funds shall be established only
pursuant to an act of the legislature. The legislature, in establishing or
reviewing a special fund to determine whether it should be continued, shall
ensure that the special fund:

(1) Serves a need, as demonstrated by:

(A) The purpose of the program to be
supported by the fund;

(B) The scope of the program, including
financial information on fees to be charged, sources of projected revenue, and
costs; and

(C) An explanation of why the program cannot
be implemented successfully under the general fund appropriation process;

(2) Reflects a clear nexus between the benefits
sought and charges made upon the program users or beneficiaries or a clear link
between the program and the sources of revenue, as opposed to serving primarily
as a means to provide the program or users with an automatic means of support
that is removed from the normal budget and appropriation process;

(3) Provides an appropriate means of financing for
the program or activity that is used only when essential to the successful
operation of the program or activity; and

(4) Demonstrates the capacity to be financially
self-sustaining. [L 2002, c 178, pt of §2; am L 2013, c 130, §4]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next